Georgia, session 2025_26, HB653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
13 SECTION 1.
14 Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public utilities and public
15 transportation, is amended by redesignating Code Sections 46-2-1 and 46-2-1.1, relating to
16 election of commissioners and terms of office and elections for Public Service Commission
H. B. 653
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0438
17 districts 2, 3, and 5, respectively, as Code Sections 46-2-1.1 and 46-2-1.2, respectively, and
18 by replacing the terms "Georgia Public Service Commission" and "Public Service
19 Commission" with the terms "Georgia Public Utilities Commission" and "Public Utilities
20 Commission", respectively, whenever such terms occur in said Code sections.
21 SECTION 2.
22 Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
23 "46-2-1.
24 (a) The Georgia Public Service Commission which existed on December 31, 2026, is
25 continued in existence but on and after January 1, 2027, shall become and be known as the
26 Georgia Public Utilities Commission. The Georgia Public Utilities Commission shall
27 succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the
28 Georgia Public Service Commission that were in effect on December 31, 2026, or
29 scheduled to go into effect on or after January 1, 2027, and shall further succeed to any
30 rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Georgia Public Service
31 Commission that were in effect on December 31, 2026. Such rules, regulations, policies,
32 procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed,
33 superseded, or nullified by the Georgia Public Utilities Commission by proper authority
34 or as otherwise provided by law.
35 (b) The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases,
36 agreements, and other transactions entered into before January 1, 2027, by the Georgia
37 Public Service Commission shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges,
38 entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the Georgia Public Service
39 Commission becoming and being known as the Georgia Public Utilities Commission. In
40 all such instances, the Georgia Public Utilities Commission shall be substituted for the
41 Georgia Public Service Commission, and the Georgia Public Utilities Commission shall
H. B. 653
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0438
42 succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other
43 transactions.
44 (c) The members of the Georgia Public Service Commission in office immediately
45 preceding January 1, 2027, shall continue to serve out their terms of office as members of
46 the Public Utilities Commission and until their respective successors are elected and
47 qualified as provided by law."
48 SECTION 3.
49 Various titles of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated are amended by replacing the terms
50 "Georgia Public Service Commission", "Public Service Commission", and "public service
51 commission" with the terms "Georgia Public Utilities Commission", "Public Utilities
52 Commission", and "public utilities commission", respectively, wherever such terms occur
53 in:
54 (1) Code Section 5-6-35, relating to cases requiring applicable for appeal, requirements
55 for application, exhibits, response, issuance of appellate court order regarding appeal,
56 procedure, supersedeas, jurisdiction of appeal, and appeals involving nonmonetary
57 judgments in custody cases;
58 (2) Code Section 10-1-395, relating to authority and duties of the Attorney General, the
59 Consumer Advisory Board, and relations with other regulatory agencies;
60 (3) Code Section 10-1-439.12, relating to exemptions relative to online automatic
61 renewal transparency;
62 (4) Code Section 10-1-857, relating to complaints, inquiries, investigations, and
63 corrective action;
64 (5) Code Section 12-5-295, relating to applicability of part;
65 (6) Code Section 12-7-17, relating to exemptions relative to control of soil erosion and
66 sedimentation;
H. B. 653
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0438
67 (7) Code Section 12-8-24, relating to permits for solid waste or special solid waste
68 handling, disposal, or thermal treatment technology facility and inspection of solid waste
69 generators;
70 (8) Code Section 14-4-2, relating to existing venue statutes unaffected by chapter;
71 (9) Code Section 14-4-42, relating to applications of laws governing par stock to nonpar
72 stock;
73 (10) Code Section 16-11-65, relating to license to intercept telephonic communications
74 for business service improvement and regulatory powers of Georgia Public Service
75 Commission;
76 (11) Code Section 19-11-9.1, relating to duty to furnish information about obligor to
77 department, use of information obtained, and penalty for noncompliance;
78 (12) Code Section 21-2-502, relating to issuance of certificates of election and
79 commission and Governor's proclamation as to constitutional amendments;
80 (13) Code Section 21-5-30, relating to contributions made to candidate or campaign
81 committee or for recall of a public officer;
82 (14) Code Section 21-5-30.1, contributions by regulated entities to elected executive
83 officers or candidates;
84 (15) Code Section 25-9-3, relating to definitions relative to blasting or excavating near
85 underground facilities;
86 (16) Code Section 32-9-6, relating to financial assistance for rail service;
87 (17) Code Section 35-2-49, relating to provision of uniforms and equipment to sworn
88 members of the Department of Public Safety and radio operators and retention of
89 weapons and badges upon retirement;
90 (18) Code Section 36-35-6, relating to limitations on home rule powers;
91 (19) Code Section 36-60-21, relating to contracts with private companies to construct
92 and operate private toll roads and bridges to facilitate public transportation without
93 additional tax revenues;
H. B. 653
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0438
94 (20) Code Section 36-61-8, relating to powers of municipalities and counties generally;
95 (21) Code Section 40-1-23, relating to regulatory compliance inspections, notification,
96 jurisdiction, permit required, escorts or inspections, exceptions, recovery for damage or
97 discharge, civil monetary penalties, and department authority;
98 (22) Code Section 40-1-57, relating to applicability of prior action of the Public Service
99 Commission;
100 (23) Code Section 40-1-151, relating to definitions relative to Georgia limousine carriers;
101 (24) Code Section 40-2-61, relating to license plates for U.S. Senators and Congressmen,
102 state constitutional officers, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Justices of
103 Supreme Court, Judges of Court of Appeals, and Public Service Commission members;
104 (25) Code Section 40-16-5, relating to authority of commissioner, previous action by
105 department, background checks, and debt collection;
106 (26) Code Section 43-15-29, relating to exceptions to operation of chapter;
107 (27) Code Section 44-14-15, relating to fee for future conveyance and limited
108 circumstances;
109 (28) Code Section 45-5-6, relating to public official investigated by special commission
110 upon indictment, gubernatorial review if commission recommends suspension,
111 suspension, reinstatement, and replacement or temporary officer;
112 (29) Code Section 45-5-6.1, relating to suspension and vacation of office of public
113 officials convicted of felony;
114 (30) Code Section 45-7-4, relating to annual salaries of certain state officials and
115 cost-of-living adjustments;
116 (31) Code Section 45-10-25, relating to exceptions to prohibitions on transactions with
117 state agencies;
118 (32) Code Section 46-1-1, relating to definitions relative to general provisions
119 concerning public utilities and public transportation;
H. B. 653
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0438
120 (33) Code Section 46-1-2, relating to measure of damages for wrongs and injuries by
121 railroad companies generally and venue for actions against railroad companies and
122 electric companies generally;
123 (34) Code Section 46-2-8, relating to payment of salaries and expenses by commission,
124 appropriations for salaries and expenses, and designation of Public Service Commission
125 Fund;
126 (35) Code Section 46-2-10, relating to payment of special fee by corporations and
127 utilities subject to jurisdiction of commission, notice of amount due, and procedure on
128 default;
129 (36) Code Section 46-2-25.2, relating to sixteen-mile toll-free telephone calling,
130 modification of rate schedules, recovery of expenses or lost revenues by telephone
131 companies, and rate-making power of Public Service Commission not affected;
132 (37) Code Section 46-2-25.3, relating to toll-free calls within 22 miles of exchange,
133 hearings, and "net gain" defined;
134 (38) Code Section 46-2-26.3, relating to recovery of costs of conversion from oil-burning
135 to coal-burning generating facility, filing of request, public hearing, determination of rate,
136 and adjustments;
137 (39) Code Section 46-2-26.5, relating to gas supply plans and adjustment factors, filings
138 and hearing procedures, and recovery of purchase gas cost;
139 (40) Code Section 46-3-52, relating to jurisdiction of commission over cogeneration
140 facility the energy from which is used solely by operator;
141 (41) Code Section 46-3-152, relating to jurisdiction of commission over rates, services,
142 and practices of authority;
143 (42) Code Section 46-3A-1, relating to definitions relative to integrated resource
144 planning;
H. B. 653
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0438
145 (43) Code Section 46-4-53, relating to application to commission by gas utility for order
146 approving utilization or operation of underground reservoir, hearing on application
147 generally, and giving notice of hearing;
148 (44) Code Section 46-4-54, relating to investigation by state geologist of site of proposed
149 storage project, procedures involving state geologist, investigation of proposed storage
150 project by director of Environmental Protection Division, procedures involving director,
151 and investigation of proposed storage project by commission;
152 (45) Code Section 46-4-60, relating to adoption by Board of Natural Resources of rules
153 and regulations governing construction, installation, utilization, and operation of
154 underground reservoirs and stations, wells, fixtures, and other facilities, enforcement of
155 rules and regulations, and inspection and examination;
156 (46) Code Section 46-4-122, relating to exemption from regulation by Public Service
157 Commission;
158 (47) Code Section 46-4A-12, relating to construction of chapter;
159 (48) Code Section 46-5-1, relating to exercise of power of eminent domain by telephone
160 companies, placement of posts and other fixtures, regulation of construction of fixtures,
161 posts, and wires near railroad tracks, liability of telephone companies for damages,
162 required information, and due compensation;
163 (49) Code Section 46-5-6, relating to exclusive power and authority of the Public Service
164 Commission to prescribe rules and regulations regarding public pay telephones;
165 (50) Code Section 46-5-41, relating to obtaining of certificate of public convenience and
166 necessity for construction, operation, acquisition, or extension of telephone lines, plants,
167 or systems;
168 (51) Code Section 46-5-122, relating to definitions relative to emergency telephone
169 number 9-1-1 system;
170 (52) Code Section 46-5-124, relating to guidelines for implementing state-wide
171 emergency 9-1-1 system and training and equipment standards;
H. B. 653
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0438
172 (53) Code Section 46-5-126, relating to cooperation by commission and telephone
173 industry;
174 (54) Code Section 46-5-137, relating to powers of Public Service Commission not
175 affected;
176 (55) Code Section 46-5-162, relating to definitions relative to telecommunications and
177 competition development;
178 (56) Code Section 46-5-167, relating to the Universal Access Fund;
179 (57) Code Section 46-5-182, relating to certification of telecommunications companies
180 which bill for or solicit intrastate telecommunications services;
181 (58) Code Section 46-5-211, relating to consent of end user required for release of
182 telephone records and law enforcement exception;
183 (59) Code Section 46-5-213, relating to circumstances to which this article not
184 applicable;
185 (60) Code Section 46-5-222, relating to commission has no authority over setting of rates
186 or terms and conditions for the offering of broadband service, voice over Internet
187 protocol, or wireless service and limitations;
188 (61) Code Section 46-8-42, relating to certificate of incorporation, duration of corporate
189 existence, and fee for issuance of certificate;
190 (62) Code Section 46-8-73, relating to contents of petition for dissolution, certification
191 resolution recommending dissolution, attachment of resolution to petition, verification
192 of petition, and fee for filing petition;
193 (63) Code Section 46-8-75, relating to transfer of copy of petition from Secretary of State
194 to commission;
195 (64) Code Section 46-8-78, relating to order of Secretary of State accepting surrender of
196 charter and franchises and dissolving corporation and recording of petition, certificate of
197 approval, certificate of publication, and order by Secretary of State;
H. B. 653
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0438
198 (65) Code Section 46-8-196, relating to use of standard signs for highway crossings and
199 for advertising or other purposes, mutilation, destruction, and defacement of standard
200 signs, and removal of unauthorized signs by county authorities;
201 (66) Code Section 46-8A-2, relating to line or system permit required;
202 (67) Code Section 47-2-91, relating to credit for accumulations of forfeited annual and
203 sick leave;
204 (68) Code Section 48-2-100, relating to exemptions for out-of-state businesses and
205 employees conducting operations related to declared state of emergency and
206 post-emergency application;
207 (69) Code Section 48-8-3, relating to exemptions relative to state sales and use taxes;
208 (70) Code Section 48-13-16, relating to excluded businesses or practitioners and other
209 laws on occupation taxes or registration fees of local governments not repealed;
210 (71) Code Section 50-13-10, relating to declaratory judgment on validity of rules and
211 venue for actions;
212 (72) Code Section 50-13-17, relating to initial decisions in contested cases, review of
213 initial decisions, final decisions and orders, and Public Service Commission exceptions;
214 (73) Code Section 50-13-19, relating to judicial review of contested cases;
215 (74) Code Section 50-13-42, relating to applicability of article;
216 (75) Code Section 50-16-46, relating to state agencies directed to provide State
217 Properties Commission with technical assistance;
218 (76) Code Section 50-16-108, relating to lessee subject to Public Service Commission
219 regulation;
220 (77) Code Section 50-23-6, relating to loans to local governments and repayment;
221 (78) Code Section 50-32-52, relating to grants or loans to local government; and
222 (79) Code Section 50-39-51, relating to payment for costs of project, optional conditions,
223 local government power to contract, and fees.
H. B. 653
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0438
224 SECTION 4.
225 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, conditioned upon the ratification at the
226 state-wide general election held in November, 2026, of an amendment to Article IV,
227 Section I, Paragraph I of the Georgia Constitution renaming the Georgia Public Service
228 Commission as the Georgia Public Utilities Commission. If such amendment is not so
229 ratified, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on January 1, 2027.
230 SECTION 5.
231 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 653
- 10 -